Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 2. Sale of Land.

Cross references. —

For reservation to which contracts for sale, lease or grant of state land and deeds to state land, properties or interest to state land are subject, see AS

38.05.125

.

Administrative Code. —

For disposal of land, see 11 AAC 67.

Sec. 38.05.045.
Generally.

All land owned in fee by the state or to which the state may become entitled, excepting tide, submerged, or shoreland, and timber or grazing land, may be sold as provided in AS

38.05.045

—

38.05.069

and AS 38.08. However, this section does not prevent the disposition of land as provided in AS

38.05.300

,

38.05.321

,

38.05.810

—

38.05.870

,

38.05.920

,

38.05.945

and

38.05.946

.

History.

(§ 1 art IV ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 50 ch 32 SLA 1971; am § 12 ch 85 SLA 1979)

Administrative Code. —

For purchase by contract, see 11 AAC 54, art. 2.

For land planning and classification, see 11 AAC 55.

For administrative provisions, see 11 AAC 67, art. 1.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Any state agency with the power to dispose of land must attempt to secure as consideration for such disposal the maximum benefit for the citizens of the state as a whole.
A transfer which may benefit the citizens of one community may nevertheless violate the public trust doctrine where the state receives less than adequate consideration on behalf of the citizens of the state as a whole.
April 25, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.

Collateral references. —

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Lands, §§ 48, 49, 52, 64, 67, 138

72 Am. Jur. 2d, States, Territories, and Dependencies, §§ 66-68.

73B C.J.S., Public Lands, §§ 249-295.

Sec. 38.05.047.
Classification and sale of state land in municipalities. [Repealed, § 45 ch 113 SLA 1981.
For current law see AS 38.04.020.]

Sec. 38.05.050.
Disposal of land for private ownership.

The commissioner shall determine the land to be disposed of for private use. The commissioner shall determine the time and place of disposal. A public auction sale, a sale by sealed bid, a lottery sale, or a disposal of land for homesites may be held in a community that is near the land to be sold or disposed of.

History.

(§ 1 art IV ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 73 SLA 1978; am § 14 ch 113 SLA 1981; am § 21 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 9 ch 91 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 27 SLA 2012)

Administrative Code. —

For administrative provisions, see 11 AAC 67, art. 1.

For disposal of agricultural interest, see 11 AAC 67, art. 7.

Sec. 38.05.055.
Auction sale or sealed bid procedures.

Unless another method of sale is required under this chapter, AS 38.08, or AS 38.09, the sale of state land shall be made at public auction or by sealed bid, at the discretion of the director, to the highest qualified bidder as determined by the director. The director may accept bids and sell state land under this section at not less than 70 percent of the appraised fair market value of the land. To qualify to participate under this section in a public auction or sale by sealed bid of state land that is other than commercial, industrial, or agricultural land, a bidder shall have been a resident of the state for at least one year immediately preceding the date of the sale and submit proof of that fact, as the commissioner requires by regulation. A bidder may be represented by an attorney or agent at a public auction. An aggrieved bidder may appeal to the commissioner within five days after the sale for a review of the director’s determination. The sale shall be conducted by the director, and, at the time of sale, the successful bidder shall deposit an amount equal to five percent of the purchase price. The director shall immediately issue a receipt containing a description of the land or property purchased, the price bid, and the amount deposited. The receipt shall be acknowledged in writing by the bidder.

History.

(§ 2 art IV ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 9 ch 61 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 137 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 176 SLA 1978; am § 14 ch 85 SLA 1979; am § 15 ch 113 SLA 1981; am § 22 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 3 SLA 1996; am § 10 ch 91 SLA 1997; am § 2 ch 27 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

For terms required in a contract of sale for land sold under this section, see AS

38.05.065(a)

; for general provisions relating to residency, see AS

01.10.055

.

Administrative Code. —

For identification, reservation, and modification of public easements, see 11 AAC 51, art. 2.

For administrative provisions, see 11 AAC 67, art. 1.

For sale or lease at auction, see 11 AAC 67, art. 2.

For sale or grant by lottery, see 11 AAC 67, art. 4.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Disposition of surplus from disposal of mental health lands. See 1961 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 111.

Sec. 38.05.057.
Disposal of land by lottery.

The commissioner may dispose of land, including land limited to use for agricultural purposes, by lottery. The purchase price of land sold by lottery shall be the fair market value of the land as determined by the commissioner. The commissioner may sell land by lottery for less than the fair market value of the land on a determination that scarcity of land for private use in the area of the land to be sold has resulted in unrealistic land values. The lottery shall be conducted in public by the commissioner. A purchaser selected by lot shall deposit an amount equal to five percent of the purchase price within 30 days after receiving notification of the selection.

To qualify to participate in a lottery under (a) of this section, an applicant shall

at the time of application have attained the age of 18;

have been a resident of the state for not less than one year immediately preceding the date of application and submit proof of that fact as required by regulation;

not have purchased land at a sale by lottery in the state within eight years immediately preceding the sale date and certify that fact in the application.

The commissioner, after consulting with the Board of Agriculture and Conservation (AS

03.09.010

), may adopt regulations under the Administrative Procedure Act (AS 44.62) that specify qualifications for lottery participants different from those specified in (b) of this section if

an interest in land limited to agricultural purposes is to be sold under (a) of this section;

the sale is a part of a program to develop agricultural land as a renewable resource of the state; and

the regulations include residency, skill, experience, and financial requirements necessary to qualify persons who are competent and financially able to develop the land as a successful agricultural enterprise.

To apply for participation in a lottery under this section an applicant shall

be qualified under the applicable provisions of this section and certify that fact in the application; and

pay a nonrefundable application fee of not more than $25 for each application.

The director shall accept applications to purchase particular parcels under the following procedures and conditions:

the application period may not be less than 45 days;

no application may be accepted less than 15 days before each lottery;

notice of the application period and the date of the lottery shall be given in accordance with AS

38.05.945

; and

the application shall be made on a form provided by the department.

If only one application for a parcel is received, the commissioner shall offer the parcel to the applicant who applied for the parcel if the applicant is qualified to participate in the lottery. If more than one application is received for a parcel, the commissioner shall select the applicant who is entitled to receive a conveyance of the land by lottery. If the commissioner does not receive an application for a parcel of state land or if a purchaser fails to sign a lease agreement or contract of sale, the parcel shall be offered to the first eligible person to apply for the parcel. If the parcel was designated as a homesite and offered to the public under former AS 38.05.047(f), the parcel shall be disposed of under the terms required by AS 38.08.

[Repealed, § 38 ch 91 SLA 1997.]

An aggrieved lottery participant may appeal to the commissioner within five days after the lottery is conducted for a review of the lottery procedures.

The director may include in contracts for sale of land under this section terms which

require purchasers to use or occupy, or both, the land purchased for a reasonable period of time after a sale;

prohibit the resale of land purchased by the initial purchaser until the requirements imposed under (1) of this subsection, if any, are satisfied.

The commissioner may require a participant in a lottery under this section for the sale of land that is part of an agricultural development project under former AS 44.33.475 to submit a single application for that land. Immediately following the drawing of an applicant’s name in the lottery, the applicant shall be given an opportunity to select for purchase one parcel of the land that is offered in the lottery. The names of alternate applicants shall be drawn after all parcels have been selected. If the applicant who originally selected a parcel unequivocally rejects the offer to purchase the parcel or fails to sign the contract of sale within the period of time specified by the commissioner, the parcel shall be offered for sale to alternate applicants in the order in which their names were drawn.

History.

(§ 4 ch 176 SLA 1978; am §§ 15 — 22 ch 85 SLA 1979; am § 16 ch 113 SLA 1981; am § 2 ch 129 SLA 1982; am § 5 ch 103 SLA 1983; am §§ 96, 97 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 53 ch 21 SLA 1985; am § 5 ch 1 FSSLA 1996; am § 5 ch 20 SLA 1997; am §§ 11, 38 ch 91 SLA 1997; am § 21 ch 81 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

In the first sentence of (b) of the section, the words “an applicant” were substituted in 1984 for “a potential purchaser” in order to attain uniformity in terminology.

Cross references. —

For terms required in a contract of sale for land sold under this section, see AS

38.05.065(b)

.

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For administrative provisions, see 11 AAC 67, art. 1.

For sale or grant by lottery, see 11 AAC 67, art. 4.

For disposal of agricultural interest, see 11 AAC 67, art. 7.

Editor’s notes. —

On June 7, 1996, the enactment of CSSB 162(FIN) (Nineteenth Legislature, Second Session), designated as ch. 1, FSSLA 1996, became the subject of a lawsuit relating to the legislative override of the governor’s veto of that bill. On April 16, 1997, the superior court issued a Final Declaratory Judgment stating that the governor’s veto of CSSB 162(FIN) “was not timely overridden by the Alaska Legislature” and that “CSSB 162(FIN) was not enacted into law.”

Honorable Tony Knowles v. Legislative Council

, No. 1JU 96-1276 CI (Sup. Ct. Apr. 16, 1997). On appeal, the Alaska Supreme Court vacated the judgment and directed the superior court to dismiss the action, concluding that the matter was an action brought in the name of the state against the legislature in violation of article III, sec. 16 of the Alaska Constitution.

Legislative Council v. Knowles

, 988 P.2d 604 (Alaska 1999).

The provisions of Section 5, ch. 20, SLA 1997, are given effect. These 1997 provisions are identical to the 1996 provisions of Section 5 of CSSB 162(FIN).

Opinions of attorney general. —

The state cannot use an application process for its disposal of land near the boundaries of a city that gives preference to that city’s residents with respect to lottery disposals under this section and probably also cannot do so with respect to homesite disposals under AS 38.08.
July 15, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 38.05.058.
Land discount program. [Repealed, § 19 ch 67 SLA 1983.]

Sec. 38.05.059.
Sale of agricultural land.

The commissioner, after consulting with the Board of Agriculture and Conservation (AS

03.09.010

), may provide for the sale of land classified under AS

38.05.020(b)(6)

for agricultural uses in parcels or tracts described by aliquot parts. The parcels or tracts are subject to state subdivision requirements and municipal ordinances. Money from a sale of agricultural land shall be separately accounted for and may be appropriated to the agricultural revolving loan fund (AS

03.10.040

).

History.

(§ 3 ch 129 SLA 1982; am § 6 ch 1 FSSLA 1996; am § 6 ch 20 SLA 1997; am § 22 ch 81 SLA 2000)

Editor’s notes. —

On June 7, 1996, the enactment of CSSB 162(FIN) (Nineteenth Legislature, Second Session), designated as ch. 1, FSSLA 1996, became the subject of a lawsuit relating to the legislative override of the governor’s veto of that bill. On April 16, 1997, the superior court issued a Final Declaratory Judgment stating that the governor’s veto of CSSB 162(FIN) “was not timely overridden by the Alaska Legislature” and that “CSSB 162(FIN) was not enacted into law.”

Honorable Tony Knowles v. Legislative Council

, No. 1JU 96-1276 CI (Sup. Ct. Apr. 16, 1997). On appeal, the Alaska Supreme Court vacated the judgment and directed the superior court to dismiss the action, concluding that the matter was an action brought in the name of the state against the legislature in violation of article III, sec. 16 of the Alaska Constitution.

Legislative Council v. Knowles

, 988 P.2d 604 (Alaska 1999).

The provisions of Section 6, ch. 20, SLA 1997, are given effect. These 1997 provisions are identical to the 1996 provisions of Section 6 of CSSB 162(FIN).

Sec. 38.05.060.
Rejection of bids.

Before the signing of the formal conveyance by the director, the commissioner may reject all bids when the best interests of the state justify this action. Land offered at public sale but not sold may be made available at private sale for not less than its appraised value.

History.

(§ 2 art IV ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 9 ch 61 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 137 SLA 1962)

Administrative Code. —

For administrative provisions, see 11 AAC 67, art. 1.

Sec. 38.05.063.
Sales for pipeline purposes. [Repealed, § 31 ch 3 FSSLA 1973.]

Sec. 38.05.065.
Terms of contract of sale.

The contract of sale for land sold at public auction or by sealed bid under AS

38.05.055

shall require the remainder of the purchase price to be paid in monthly, quarterly, or annual installments over a period of not more than 20 years, with interest at the rate provided in (i) of this section. Installment payments plus interest shall be set on the level-payment basis.

The contract of sale for land sold under AS

38.05.057

or under former AS 38.05.078 shall require the remainder of the purchase price to be paid in monthly, quarterly, or annual installments over a period of not more than 20 years. Installment payments plus interest shall be set on the level-payment basis. The interest rate to be charged on installment payments is the rate provided in (i) of this section.

The director shall, for contracts under (a), (b), or (h) of this section, set out in the contract for each sale the period for the payment of installments and the total purchase price plus interest. The director, with the consent of the commissioner, may also include in contracts under this section conditions, limitations, and terms considered necessary and proper to protect the interest of the state. Violations of any provision of this chapter or the terms of the contract of sale subject the purchaser to appropriate administrative and legal action, including but not limited to specific performance, foreclosure, ejectment, or other legal remedies in accordance with applicable state law.

If a contract for a sale of state land has been breached, the director may issue a decision to foreclose and terminate the contract at any time 31 days after delivering by certified mail a written notice of the breach to the address of record of the purchaser. A breach caused by the failure to make payments required by the contract may be cured within 30 days after the notice of the breach has been received by the purchaser by payment of the sum in default together with the larger of a fee of $50 or five percent of the sum in default. If there are material facts in dispute between the state and the purchaser, the purchaser may submit a written request for a public hearing for the review of the facts within 30 days after the notice of the breach has been received.

On a determination that there has been a breach of the contract based on the administrative record and the evidence presented at a hearing, the director shall issue a decision foreclosing the interest of the purchaser and terminating the contract. The obligation to make payments under the contract continues through the date of the decision to foreclose by the director.

The director shall deliver the decision to foreclose and terminate personally to the purchaser or send it certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address of record of the purchaser. If the breach is a failure to make payments required by the contract, the decision shall include a notice to the purchaser that if within 30 days the purchaser pays to the state the full amount of the unpaid contract price, including all accrued interest, and any fees assessed under (d) of this section, the department shall issue to the purchaser a deed to the land. If full payment is not made within 30 days or the breach is for other than failure to make payment, the decision forecloses and terminates all legal and equitable rights the purchaser has in the land.

The purchaser may appeal the director’s decision to the commissioner within 30 days. The final decision by the department is reviewable under AS

44.62.560

.

The commissioner, after consulting with the Board of Agriculture and Conservation (AS

03.09.010

),

shall provide that, notwithstanding (a) and (b) of this section, in a contract for the sale of land classified under AS

38.05.020(b)(6)

for agricultural uses, the interest rate to be charged on installment payments may not exceed 9.5 percent; and

may declare a moratorium of up to five years on payments on land sold under this section for land classified under AS

38.05.020(b)(6)

for agricultural uses if

the commissioner determines that the moratorium is in the best interest of the state;

the commissioner certifies and the contract purchaser agrees to perform farm development, crop production, and harvesting, not including land clearing or related activity, requiring the expenditure of amounts equivalent to the payments that would otherwise be made during the moratorium;

the sale of the agricultural land takes place after July 1, 1979; and

the contract purchaser is in compliance with the development plan specified in the purchase contract at the time the purchaser applies for a moratorium under this paragraph and remains in compliance with the development plan during the moratorium; for the payments subject to the moratorium declared under this paragraph, interest payments are subject to the moratorium but interest continues to accrue during the moratorium.

The interest rate for contracts under this section is the prime rate as reported in the Wall Street Journal on the first business day of the month in which the contract is sent to the purchaser for signature, plus three percent; however, the total rate of interest may not exceed

9.5 percent, in contracts for the sale of land classified under AS

38.05.020(b)(6)

for agricultural uses; or

13.5 percent, in other contracts for the sale of land.

History.

(§ 3 art IV ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 5 ch 176 SLA 1978; am §§ 26, 27 ch 85 SLA 1979; am §§ 17, 18 ch 113 SLA 1981; am §§ 23, 24 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 165 SLA 1984; am §§ 7, 8 ch 1 FSSLA 1996; am §§ 7, 8 ch 20 SLA 1997; am §§ 12 — 14 ch 91 SLA 1997; am § 23 ch 81 SLA 2000; am § 3 ch 27 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (h) of this section was enacted as (d). Relettered in 1984.

In 2010, in (h)(2)(D) of this section, “paragraph” was substituted for “subsection” to correct a manifest error in ch. 20, SLA 1997.

Administrative Code. —

For purchase by contract, see 11 AAC 54, art. 2.

For administrative provisions, see 11 AAC 67, art. 1.

For installment contracts, see 11 AAC 67, art. 9.

Editor’s notes. —

On June 7, 1996, the enactment of CSSB 162(FIN) (Nineteenth Legislature, Second Session), designated as ch. 1, FSSLA 1996, became the subject of a lawsuit relating to the legislative override of the governor’s veto of that bill. On April 16, 1997, the superior court issued a Final Declaratory Judgment stating that the governor’s veto of CSSB 162(FIN) “was not timely overridden by the Alaska Legislature” and that “CSSB 162(FIN) was not enacted into law.”

Honorable Tony Knowles v. Legislative Council

, No. 1JU 96-1276 CI (Sup. Ct. Apr. 16, 1997). On appeal, the Alaska Supreme Court vacated the judgment and directed the superior court to dismiss the action, concluding that the matter was an action brought in the name of the state against the legislature in violation of article III, sec. 16 of the Alaska Constitution.

Legislative Council v. Knowles

, 988 P.2d 604 (Alaska 1999).

The provisions of Sections 7 and 8, ch. 20, SLA 1997, are given effect. These 1997 provisions are identical to the 1996 provisions of Sections 7 and 8 of CSSB 162(FIN).

Sec. 38.05.066.
Preference to persons for fishery purposes. [Repealed, § 34 ch 94 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 38.05.067.
Preference for veterans for unoccupied residential land.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, before offering to the general public any unoccupied residential land, the director shall offer the land at a restricted sale at which only veterans may buy.

The director may not sell the land under this section at less than the appraised fair market value. The director shall adopt regulations necessary to ensure that land sold under this section is for bona fide residential use and not for speculation.

When not in conflict with this section, other provisions of AS

38.05.045

—

38.05.067

apply to sales under this section.

This section does not apply to the sale of state land under AS

38.05.057

, AS 38.08, or AS 38.09.

In this section, “veteran” means a person with 90 days or more of active service in the armed forces of the United States who has been honorably discharged or a person with 90 days or more of service in the Alaska Territorial Guard.

History.

(§ 4 art IV ch 169 SLA 1959; added by ch 102 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 28 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 1 SLA 1968; am §§ 28, 29 ch 85 SLA 1979; am § 35 ch 94 SLA 1980; am §§ 19, 20 ch 113 SLA 1981; am § 6 ch 103 SLA 1983; am § 16 ch 93 SLA 1991; am § 15 ch 91 SLA 1997; am § 80 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsections (d) and (e) were formerly (e) and (d) respectively. Relettered in 1989.

Administrative Code. —

For preference right sales, see 11 AAC 67, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (b) substituted “appraised fair market value” for “fair appraised market value” at the end of the first sentence.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Discussion of meaning of “honorably discharged” in subsection (e). April 17, 1984, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 38.05.068.
Forest Service permittees’ sales preference.

Before offering to the public any land which is subject to a valid existing United States Forest Service permit in effect on the day before that land is tentatively approved for patent to the state, or which is subject to a lease issued under AS

38.05.087

, the director shall offer the land for sale to the permittee or a successor in title, if the permittee or a successor in title of the permittee can be found.

When not in conflict with this section, the provisions of AS

38.05.045

—

38.05.069

apply to sales under this section.

If the permit described in (a) of this section is for a recreational cabin, recreational residence, nonrecreational residence, or a residence of a community nature and the land is used for noncommercial residential or recreational purposes, the purchase price offered to a permittee or the successor of a permittee shall be an amount determined by the commissioner which is equal to the state money required to be spent in order to sell the land plus the cost of survey or resurvey, if the survey or resurvey is made by the department or a contractor of the department.

If the permit described in (a) of this section is for a use other than a use listed in (c) of this section, the purchase price offered to a permittee or the successor of a permittee shall be not less than the appraised fair market value of the land.

History.

(§ 1 ch 26 SLA 1963; am § 39 ch 127 SLA 1974; am §§ 1, 2 ch 26 SLA 1979)

Administrative Code. —

For preference right sales, see 11 AAC 67, art. 3.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The director of land and water management has the authority to grant a preference right to one party under AS

38.05.035(b)

for the sale of land that is subject to a preference right held by another party under this section.
November 14, 1984, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 38.05.069.
Preference to persons for agricultural purposes.

After consulting with the Board of Agriculture and Conservation (AS

03.09.010

), on a determination that the highest and best use of unoccupied land is for agricultural purposes and that it is in the best interests of the state to sell or lease the land, the commissioner shall grant to an Alaska resident owning and using or leasing and using land for agricultural purposes a first option to purchase or lease the unoccupied land situated adjacent to land presently held by the Alaska resident for the amount of the high bid received at public auction or by sealed bid. If more than one Alaska resident qualifies for a first option under this section, eligibility for the first option shall be determined by lot, and the option must be exercised on the conclusion of the public auction or opening of sealed bids. A parcel of agricultural land sold under this section may not be less than 20 acres, and a parcel of agricultural land that is acquired by exercise of the option granted in this subsection may not exceed 320 acres. Agricultural land that is acquired under this section must be used for agricultural purposes as required by law.

[Repealed, § 88 ch 152 SLA 1984.]

Under this section,

the director may transfer state land classified for agriculture only for agricultural purposes;

the sale or lease shall be at public auction or by sealed bid.

When not in conflict with this section, the provisions of AS

38.05.045

—

38.05.105

apply to disposals under this section.

Nothing in (c) of this section affects the disposal of minerals under AS

38.05.135

—

38.05.183

.

In this section,

“adjacent” means that a tract of land has one common boundary point with presently held land or is separated from the presently held land only by a physical barrier such as a road or stream;

“agricultural purposes” includes farming, ranching, grazing, and storage or control of agricultural crops or livestock.

History.

(§ 1 ch 97 SLA 1965; am §§ 1, 2 ch 71 SLA 1976; am §§ 4 — 6 ch 257 SLA 1976; am § 30 ch 85 SLA 1979; am §§ 25, 26, 88 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 16 ch 91 SLA 1997; am § 24 ch 81 SLA 2000; am §§ 4, 5 ch 27 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (e) was formerly (f) and subsection (f) was formerly (e).
Relettered in 2010 to maintain the definitions at the end of the section. Paragraph (f)(1) was originally enacted as (e)(2). Renumbered in 1997 in order to maintain alphabetical order in light of the 1997 amendments.

Cross references. —

For provision restricting the sale, lease or other disposal of agricultural land in a manner inconsistent with this section, see AS

38.05.321

.

For provision directing the commissioner of natural resources to issue a patent for the remaining interest in the land estate to the owner of rights to that land for agricultural purposes under certain conditions, notwithstanding this section, see § 1, ch. 37, SLA 2006, in the 2006 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For disposal of agricultural interest, see 11 AAC 67, art. 7.